Nebraska, session 109, LB1076.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB1076 LB1076
2026 2026
Section 1. Section 57-1601, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
57-1601 Sections 57-1601 to 57-1624 and sections 3 and 4 of this act
shall be known and may be cited as the Nebraska Geologic Storage of
Carbon Dioxide Act.
Sec. 2. Section 57-1620, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
57-1620 (1) Any person who violates any provision of the Nebraska
Geologic Storage of Carbon Dioxide Act or any rule, regulation, or order
of the commission under the act shall be guilty of a Class II
misdemeanor. Each day that such violation continues shall constitute a
separate offense.
(2) If any person, for the purpose of evading the provisions of the
act or any rule, regulation, or order of the commission under the act,
makes or causes to be made any false entry or statement in a report
required by the act or by any such rule, regulation, or order, makes or
causes to be made any false entry in any record, account, or memorandum
required by the act or by any such rule, regulation, or order, or removes
from this state or destroys, mutilates, alters, or falsifies any such
record, account, or memorandum, such person shall be guilty of a Class II
misdemeanor.
(3) Any person who knowingly and willfully violates any provision of
the act or any rule, regulation, or order of the commission shall be
guilty of a Class I misdemeanor.
(4) Any person who knowingly and willfully commits any of the
following offenses shall be guilty of a Class I misdemeanor:
(a) Making any false statement, representation, or certification in
any application, report, plan, or other document required to be filed or
maintained by the rules or regulations adopted by the commission; or
(b) Falsifying, tampering with, or rendering inaccurate any
monitoring device or method used or required for compliance with any
-2-

LB1076 LB1076
2026 2026
permit or the rules or regulations adopted and promulgated by the
commission.
(5) (3) Any person who knowingly aids or abets any other person in
the violation of any provision of the act or any rule, regulation, or
order of the commission under the act shall be subject to the same
penalty as that prescribed by the act for the violation by such other
person.
(6) (4) The penalties provided in this section shall be recoverable
by suit filed by the Attorney General in the name and on behalf of the
commission, in the district court of the county in which the defendant
resides, or in which any defendant resides if there be more than one
defendant, or in the district court of any county in which the violation
occurred. The payment of any such penalty shall not operate to relieve a
person on whom the penalty is imposed from liability to any other person
for damages arising out of such violation.
(7) (5) In determining the amount of the penalty, the court shall
consider:
(a) The nature of the violation, including its circumstances and
gravity, and the hazard or potential hazard to the public's or a private
person's health, safety, and economic welfare;
(b) The economic or environmental harm caused by the violation;
(c) The economic value or other advantage gained by the person
committing the violation;
(d) The history of previous violations;
(e) The amount necessary to deter future violations;
(f) Efforts to correct the violation; and
(g) Other matters justice requires.
Sec. 3. (1) In addition to the penalties prescribed in section
57-1620 and section 4 of this act, whenever it appears that any person is
violating or threatening to violate any provision of the Nebraska
Geologic Storage of Carbon Dioxide Act, any rule, regulation, or order of
-3-

LB1076 LB1076
2026 2026
the commission, or any term, condition, or limitation of any permit
issued pursuant to such act, rule, regulation, or order, such person may
be subject to a civil penalty imposed by the commission. The civil
penalty shall be at least two thousand five hundred dollars per day, not
to exceed ten thousand dollars per day.
(2) Proceedings before the commission may be instituted upon motion
by the commission or by any interested person to:
(a) Assess or recover civil penalties;
(b) Revoke, suspend, modify, or limit any permit issued by the
commission to such person; or
(c) Impose by order such other conditions as the commission
determines appropriate.
The commission shall establish and maintain procedures for receiving
and ensuring proper consideration of information received from the public
about violations of any provision of the act or any rule, regulation, or
order of the commission.
(3) No civil penalty shall be imposed until written notice is sent
pursuant to subsection (4) of this section and a period of ten days has
elapsed in which the person may come into compliance if possible. If any
violation is a continuing one, each day a violation continues after such
ten-day period shall constitute a separate violation for the purpose of
computing the applicable civil penalty and the amount of the penalty
shall be based on the severity of the violation. Civil penalties
assessed, sought, or agreed upon by the commission under this subsection
shall be appropriate to the violation considering the factors listed in
subsection (7) of section 57-1620. The commission may compromise,
mitigate, or remit such penalties.
(4) Whenever the commission intends to impose a civil penalty under
this section, the commission shall notify the person in writing (a)
setting forth the date, facts, and nature of each violation with which
the person is charged, (b) specifically identifying the particular
-4-

LB1076 LB1076
2026 2026
provision or provisions of the section, rule, regulation, order, or
permit involved in the violation, and (c) specifying the amount of each
penalty which the commission intends to impose. Such written notice shall
be sent by registered or certified mail to the last-known address of such
person. The notice shall also advise such person of his or her right to a
hearing and that failure to pay any civil penalty subsequently imposed by
the commission will result in a civil action by the commission to collect
such penalty. The person so notified may, within thirty days of receipt
of such notice, submit a written request for a hearing to review any
penalty to be imposed by the commission. A hearing shall be held in
accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act, and any person upon
whom a civil penalty is subsequently imposed may appeal such penalty
pursuant to such act. On the request of the commission, the Attorney
General or county attorney may institute a civil action to collect a
penalty imposed pursuant to this section.
(5) The commission shall, within thirty days from receipt, remit any
collected civil penalty to the State Treasurer for credit to the Carbon
Dioxide Storage Facility Administrative Fund. Any civil penalty assessed
under this section that remains unpaid for more than sixty days after the
issuance of the decision of the commission shall constitute a debt to the
state which may be collected in the same manner as a lien foreclosure or
sued for and recovered in any proper form of action in the name of the
state in the district court of the county in which the person resides or
owns property.
Sec. 4. In addition to the penalties prescribed under section
57-1620 and section 3 of this act, the commission, upon receipt of
information that any person is violating or threatening to violate any
provision of the Nebraska Geologic Storage of Carbon Dioxide Act by
engaging in any unauthorized activity which is endangering or causing
damage to public health or the environment, is authorized to restrain
immediately and effectively any such person. The commission may restrain
-5-

LB1076 LB1076
2026 2026
such person by its own order or by suit filed by the Attorney General in
the name and on behalf of the commission, in the district court of the
county in which the defendant resides, or in which any defendant resides
if there be more than one defendant, or in the district court of any
county in which the violation occurred.
Sec. 5. Original sections 57-1601 and 57-1620, Reissue Revised
Statutes of Nebraska, are repealed.
-6-